Utah statutes.
23-20-12.   Airplanes or terrestrial or aquatic vehicles -- Use in taking wildlife unlawful -- Exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person to take any wildlife from an airplane or any other airborne vehicle or device or any motorized terrestrial or aquatic vehicle, including snowmobiles and other recreational vehicles, except as provided by this code or in the rules and regulations of the Wildlife Board. Provided, however, that an individual validly licensed to hunt who is a paraplegic, or otherwise permanently disabled so as to be permanently confined to a wheelchair or the use of crutches, may be authorized to hunt from a vehicle under terms and conditions specified by the Wildlife Board.

